Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-516
Unlawful sale; violation; penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of sections 57-508 to 57-516 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 240, § 9, p. 807;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 57.